Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-506
Funds; limitations upon withdrawals.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall at no time draw warrants or create obligations against any of the funds provided in sections 14-501 and 14-502 in excess of the amount credited to such funds at the time of drawing the warrant or creating the obligation. The director of any department shall not draw or cause to be drawn a warrant or create or cause to be created an obligation against the appropriation to such director's department in excess of the amount credited to such department.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 5, p. 470;

C.S.1922, § 3629;

C.S.1929, § 14-506;

R.S.1943, § 14-506;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 157.
July 21, 2022
Section cited as showing background for action of city council in suspending fireman three days each month and attempting to deduct an additional sum from salary. Bishop v. City of Omaha, 130 Neb. 162, 264 N.W. 447 (1936).